Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-476
Person, defined.

Person shall mean every natural person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 383.